Arkansas, session 2025, HB1690.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Transfer of the Nuclear Planning and
Response Program from the Department of Health to the Division of Emergency
Management within the Department of Public Safety.
(a) The Nuclear Planning and Response Program, established under § 20-
21-401 et seq., shall be transferred by a cabinet-level department transfer
under § 25-43-101 et seq. from the Department of Health to the Division of
Emergency Management on July 1, 2025.
(b) The statutory authority, powers, duties, functions, records,
personnel, property, contracts, and unexpended balances of appropriations,
allocations, or other funds, including the functions of budgeting or
purchasing of the Nuclear Planning and Response Program, are transferred to
the Division of Emergency Management on July 1, 2025.
(c)(1) The transfer of the Nuclear Planning and Response Program does
not affect the orders, rules, regulations, directives, or standards made or
*JMB130*
03/05/2025 9:37:41 AM JMB130

HB1690
promulgated by the Department of Health before the effective date of this
act.
(2) The orders, rules, regulations, directives, or standards
under subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall continue with full force and
effect until amended or repealed under authority given by law.
(d) The Department of Health shall grant access to and provide all
information requested by the Division of Emergency Management to accomplish
the transfer of the Nuclear Planning and Response Program.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code §§ 20-21-401 — 405 are amended to read as
follows:
20-21-401. Legislative intent — Definitions.
(a) It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the
operation of nuclear nuclear-powered electricity generating facilities in
this state raises the possibility of adverse health and ecological effects
which could result from radiological incidents or accidents at those
facilities and that it is essential to the health and welfare of the citizens
of this state and particularly those in close proximity to the facilities
that a program be initiated to provide for continuous environmental
surveillance in the area of nuclear nuclear-powered electricity generating
facilities and to initiate and formulate plans and procedures for immediate
emergency response capability in the event of an accident or incident which
might endanger the lives or property of persons.
(b) The General Assembly further determines that it is appropriate
that the utility operating the facilities bear the cost associated with
preparing and implementing plans to deal with the effects of nuclear
accidents or incidents.
(c) Therefore, it is the purpose and intent of this subchapter to:
(1) Initiate initiate a program to deal with this matter; and to
charge the Department of Health
(2) Charge the Division of Emergency Management with the
responsibility of carrying out the program; and
(3) Provide to provide for funding the program through fees or
assessments against utilities operating nuclear nuclear-powered electricity
generating facilities.
(d) As used in this subchapter:
03/05/2025 9:37:41 AM JMB130

HB1690
(1) "Chief financial officer" means:
(A) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State; or
(B) The chief financial officer of the Department of
Public Safety; and
(2) "Continuous environmental radiation surveillance" means:
(A) The tracking of radiological dispersal devices or
radiological exposure devices:
(i) Related to a nuclear-powered electricity
generating facility located within this state; and
(ii) Located within this state or being transported
through this state;
(B) Radiological dose assessment and field team response
in the area of any nuclear-powered electricity generating facility:
(i) Requested by a county judge or mayor during an
emergency, drill, or exercise; or
(ii) Required for documentation by Public Health and
Medical Services, Emergency Function #8; and
(C) Any other radiation monitoring service related to a
nuclear-powered electricity generating facility located within this state
that is:
(i) Determined to be necessary by the Department of
Health; and
(ii) Approved by the Director of the Division of
Emergency Management.

20-21-402. Administration by Department of Health Division of
Emergency Management.
(a) The Department of Health Division of Emergency Management shall
carry out a the Nuclear Planning and Response Program designed to protect the
lives and property of persons of this state from radiation hazards and other
hazards which may result from the establishment and operation of nuclear
electrical nuclear-powered electricity generating facilities in this state.
(b) The program shall include:
(1) Continuous environmental radiation surveillance in the area
of any nuclear nuclear-powered electricity generating facility;
(2) The training and education of persons residing in the areas
03/05/2025 9:37:41 AM JMB130

HB1690
regarding nuclear hazards and protective measures to be taken in the event of
a radiological incident or accident;
(3) A plan for immediate emergency response capability in the
event of an incident or accident at the facility;
(4) The dissemination of information to the public pertaining to
radiation hazards;
(5) Protective measures, evacuation procedures, and other
appropriate actions to be taken in the event of a radiation incident or
accident; and
(6) Such other matters as the department division shall
determine to be necessary or appropriate to educate, inform, and equip
citizens of this state to deal with any incident or accident at or resulting
from the operation of nuclear nuclear-powered electricity generating
facilities.
(c) To carry out the responsibilities provided for in this subchapter,
the department division may employ such personnel as is deemed necessary to
the extent that funds are appropriated therefor by the General Assembly.
(d) The Department of Health shall:
(1) Provide continuous environmental radiation surveillance as
required by subdivision (b)(1) of this section; and
(2)(A) Receive compensation for the continuous environmental
radiation surveillance required under subdivision (b)(1) of this section
from:
(i) The Arkansas Nuclear Planning and Response Fund;
or
(ii) Funds appropriated by the General Assembly to
the division for the operation and maintenance of the Nuclear Planning and
Response Program.
(B) The amount of compensation provided to the department
under subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section shall be:
(i) Determined by the chief financial officer; and
(ii) Approved by the Director of the Division of
Emergency Management.

20-21-403. Operating funds.
(a)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State chief financial officer
03/05/2025 9:37:41 AM JMB130

HB1690
shall annually determine the approximate amount of funds which will be
necessary for the operation and maintenance of the Nuclear Planning and
Response Program.
(2) This amount The amount determined under subdivision (a)(1)
of this section shall not be in excess of the total amounts appropriated for
the program by the General Assembly for the particular year.
(2)(b)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Health Director of
the Division of Emergency Management shall certify the amount to each utility
in the state which maintains and operates one (1) or more nuclear nuclear-
powered electricity generating facilities in the state.
(2) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State chief financial
officer shall then notify each utility of the portion of the amount to be
paid by each utility.
(b)(c) The cost of maintaining and operating the program shall be
apportioned to the utilities in this state operating nuclear nuclear-powered
electricity generating facilities in such proportions as the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State chief financial officer shall determine to be most
appropriate and equitable.

20-21-404. Fees.
(a) There is levied and there shall be collected annually from each
utility in this state which operates one (1) or more nuclear nuclear-powered
electricity generating facilities a fee in such amount as shall be determined
by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State chief financial officer in the
manner prescribed in this subchapter.
(b) The fees so levied against each utility shall be remitted by the
utility to the Secretary of the Department of Health Director of the Division
of Emergency Management within thirty (30) days after the amount thereof is
certified by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State chief financial officer.
(c) If any utility shall fail or refuse to pay the fees as provided in
this section within the time prescribed, the secretary director shall add to
the fee a penalty of twenty-five percent (25%) thereof and shall certify the
amount of the delinquent fee and penalty to the Attorney General for
collection.

20-21-405. Arkansas Nuclear Planning and Response Fund.
03/05/2025 9:37:41 AM JMB130

HB1690
(a)(1) All funds collected by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
chief financial officer pursuant to this subchapter shall be deposited into
the State Treasury as special revenues, and the full amount thereof shall be
credited to the Arkansas Nuclear Planning and Response Fund.
(2) Money remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year
shall carry forward and be made available for the purposes stated in this
subchapter in the next fiscal year.
(b) The fund shall be used exclusively for the operation and
maintenance of the Nuclear Planning and Response Program.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 20-21-501(3), concerning the definitions
related to nuclear planning and response grants, is amended to read as
follows:
(3) “Division of Health” means the Nuclear Planning and Response
Program of the Division of Radiation Control and Emergency Management of the
Department of Health, with the Secretary of the Department of Health having
the ultimate authority over any activities conducted by that program,
division, and department “Emergency planning zone” means the area surrounding
a nuclear-powered electricity generating facility identified by the Division
of Emergency Management for which special planning and preparedness efforts
are carried out to ensure that prompt and effective protective actions can
reduce or minimize the impact of releases of radioactive material for public
health and safety;

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code §§ 20-21-502 — 20-21-505 are amended to read
as follows:
20-21-502. Administration.
(a) The Department of Health Division of Emergency Management shall
serve as the administering and disbursing agency for a program of issuing
grants to those local governments located in such close proximity to the
emergency planning zone of nuclear-powered electricity generating facilities
in this state that federal regulations or state rules require those local
governments to maintain a radiological response plan.
(b)(1) Grants shall be issued by the department:
(1)(A) To division to the county governments in the affected
areas solely for the purpose of defraying costs associated with preparing for
03/05/2025 9:37:41 AM JMB130

HB1690
and participating in actual nuclear disaster incidents or practice nuclear
disaster exercises.
(B)(2) The chief executive officer of each county shall be
the agent of the county in entering into any agreements with the department
division in order to receive funds under this section.
(C)(3) The chief executive officer of each county shall
also be the agent of the county in entering into agreements with officials of
the local governments or their agencies within each county to disburse the
funds under this section.
(D)(4) Each county shall be eligible for that proportion
of funds issued under this section as is determined fair and necessary under
guidelines to be developed by the department division; and
(2) To the Division of Emergency Management in quarterly
installments for the sole purpose of defraying costs associated with
preparing for and participating in actual nuclear disaster incidents or
practice nuclear disaster emergency exercises involving nuclear-powered
electricity generating facilities in this state.

20-21-503. Cooperative agreements.
(a)(1) Before the award of a grant to a county for the purposes
described in this subchapter, the Department of Health Division of Emergency
Management shall draw up a proposal for a cooperative agreement between the
State of Arkansas and the eligible counties in this state.
(2) The proposal shall set forth the activities to be conducted
by the county under its radiological response plan as a prerequisite for
receipt of grant payments.
(3) The proposed cooperative agreement shall include:
(A) The responsibilities of the county as prescribed in
the county's radiological response plan and the state emergency operations
plan, as amended;
(B) The means by which the county will demonstrate that it
can meet its designated responsibilities, as defined in subdivision (a)(3)(A)
of this section, including, but not limited to, without limitation program
audits, test exercises, or operational readiness evaluations;
(C) The methods of distribution of grant funds to local
governments and their agencies to provide a fair opportunity for all
03/05/2025 9:37:41 AM JMB130

HB1690
political subdivisions within the county to benefit from grant funds;
(D) The intended use of grant funds as reflected in an
annual budget to correspond with the state fiscal year; and
(E) Any other information determined by the department
division to be necessary to ensure compliance with state rules or federal
regulations and to ensure that all expenditures of grant funds are in direct
support of radiological emergency planning or response.
(b)(1) The department division shall submit a proposal for a
cooperative agreement to the chief executive officer of each county sixty
(60) days before the beginning of the state fiscal year.
(2) The fully executed cooperative agreement shall be in effect
by August 1 of the state fiscal year.
(3) A cooperative agreement is fully executed when it is duly
signed by the Director of the Division of Radiation Control and Emergency
Management of the Department of Health, as the representative of the
department, Division of Emergency Management and the county judge as the
chief executive officer of the county.
(c) Variances from any portion of the cooperative agreement shall be
approved in writing by the director before implementation of the variance.
(d)(1)(A) Failure to perform shall result in either suspension of
funds for a specified period or complete revocation of the agreement.
(B) The specific penalty shall be determined following an
assessment of the degree of seriousness imposed by the breach of agreement.
(2) The reinstatement of eligibility for a county so penalized
shall occur only after satisfactory demonstration that the conditions or
situations resulting in the penalty have been corrected.
(3) Written notice shall be given to the chief executive officer
by the director citing the reason for the penalty and the steps necessary to
regain agreement eligibility.

20-21-504. Disbursal of funds.
(a) In disbursing funds The Division of Emergency Management shall
disburse grant funds to eligible counties which have satisfactorily fulfilled
the requirements of the cooperative agreement as set out in § 20-21-503,.
(b) If sufficient grant funds are available, the Department of Health
division shall remit a maximum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to each of
03/05/2025 9:37:41 AM JMB130

HB1690
the eligible counties to be payable during the second month of each quarter
of the state fiscal year, which months are August, November, February, and
May. The payments shall be made in equal quarterly installments of not to
exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) minimum of seventy-five
thousand dollars ($75,000) to each of the eligible counties.

20-21-505. Reporting requirements.
(a) The chief executive officer of the county shall be responsible for
submitting the following progress reports: provide the Division of Emergency
Management a progress report at least annually or as required by the
division.
(1) Quarterly Fiscal Report. Within thirty (30) days following
the end of each fiscal quarter, a report detailing the expenditure of grant
moneys shall be submitted to the Nuclear Planning and Response Program of the
Division of Radiation Control and Emergency Management of the Department of
Health. The next quarter's funds shall not be authorized until receipt of the
report covering the preceding quarter; and
(2) Year-End Program Report. Within thirty (30) days of the
completion of the state fiscal year, a report shall be submitted to the
program containing the fourth quarter fiscal report and a narrative report on
the status of the county's ability to implement its radiological response
plan.
(b) The progress report required under subsection (a) of the section
shall contain without limitation:
(1) A detailed statement of the expenditure of grant funds; and
(2) A narrative report on the status of the county’s ability to
implement its radiological response plan.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 20-21-603(b), concerning the creation of
the Nuclear Planning and Response Program Advisory Committee, is amended to
read as follows:
(b) The committee shall:
(1) Be aware of the ongoing programs of the Nuclear Planning and
Response Program as they relate to continuous environmental radiation
surveillance, training and education of persons residing in the ten-mile
Emergency Planning Zone, immediate emergency response capability,
03/05/2025 9:37:41 AM JMB130

HB1690
dissemination of information to the public, and evacuation procedures;
(2) Advise on the applicability of any federal guidelines that
may affect their respective towns and counties;
(3) Review and comment regarding the operations and coordination
of required annual exercises as they relate to their off-site emergency
capabilities to respond to a radiological incident at Arkansas Nuclear One,
Units One and Two;
(4)(A) Meet at least one (1) time in each fiscal year and at
other times on the call of the Director of the State Radiation Control Agency
Division of Emergency Management or his or her designee.
(B) A written and timely notice of the time, place, and
purpose of meetings shall be mailed by the State Radiation Control Agency
Division of Emergency Management to all committee members; and
(5) Conduct meetings in such a fashion that the local public has
received adequate notice and that space is provided for attendance.

SECTION 6. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Nuclear Planning and
Response Program preserves the public peace, health, and safety by protecting
the lives and property of persons in this state from radiation hazards and
other hazards which may result from the establishment and operation of
nuclear-powered electricity generating facilities in this state; that this
act provides for the transfer of the Nuclear Planning and Response Program to
the Division of Emergency Management; and that this act should become
effective on July 1, 2025, to coincide with the appropriation bills of the
Division of Emergency Management and the Department of Health so that the
Nuclear Planning and Response Program continues to provide its vital services
as the transition is implemented and does not experience any issues with
funding under the transfer. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and
this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health,
and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2025.





03/05/2025 9:37:41 AM JMB130